Massachusetts, session 194th, H3692.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “vehicle”, in line 68, the
following words:- “a bicycle, skateboard, or any additional mode of transportation.”
SECTION 2. Section 13 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “headphones”, in line 68, the following words:- “on public roadways or
sidewalks.”
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1